Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska42-403
Marriages and divorces; void, when unlawful.

Marriages and divorces consummated on or after April 8, 1913, among such Indians, or among their descendants, according to Indian custom, are hereby declared to be unlawful and shall be punished as hereinafter provided.

Laws 1913, c. 68, § 3, p. 202;

R.S.1913, § 1609;

C.S.1922, § 1558;

C.S.1929, § 42-403;

R.S.1943, § 42-403.